Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 5 Conservators of Adults

Cross references.

Protective services for abused, neglected, or exploited disabled adults, §

30-5-1

et seq.

Appointment of guardian for incompetent adult for purposes of administering workers’ compensation benefits to which such incompetent adult is entitled, §

34-9-226

.

Appointment of representatives and guardians ad litem for persons undergoing treatment for mental illness, mental retardation, alcoholism, and other disabilities, §§

37-3-147

,

37-4-107

,

37-7-147

.

Rights and privileges of patients and their representatives, T. 37, C. 3, Art. 6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

Law reviews.

For article, “The Georgia Law of Insanity,” see 3 Ga. B. J. 28 (1941).

For note on 1995 amendments of sections in this chapter, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 216 (1995).

For article, “Medical Decision-Making in Georgia,” see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 50 (2005).